Hawaii statutes.
§661-4 Action by alien, when. Aliens
who are citizens or subjects of a government that accords to citizens of this
State the right to prosecute claims against that government in its courts shall
have the privilege of prosecuting claims against the State under this part. [L
1894-5, c 26, §4; RL 1925, §2672; RL 1935, §4423; RL 1945, §10478; RL 1955,
§245-4; HRS §661-4; am L 1972, c 164, §1(d); am L 2016, c 55, §43]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next